Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-4118
Public Guardianship Cash Fund; created;
use; investment.

The Public Guardianship Cash Fund is created. The State
Court Administrator shall administer the fund. The fund shall consist of money
remitted pursuant to the Public Guardianship Act. The fund shall only be used
to support the Public Guardianship Act. Any money in the fund available for
investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the
Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

Laws 2014, LB920, § 18.

Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.